test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vwttwks_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - võttõks: # Noun 206 'eng /est võte/fin' - full paradigm
     võttõks+N+Sg+Nom: võttõks
     võttõks+N+Sg+Gen: võttõks
     võttõks+N+Sg+Par: võttõkst
     võttõks+N+Sg+Dat: võttõksõn
     võttõks+N+Sg+Ins: võttõksõks
     võttõks+N+Sg+Ill: võttõksõ
     võttõks+N+Sg+Ela: võttõksõst
     võttõks+N+Pl+Nom: võttõkst
     võttõks+N+Pl+Gen: võttõkst
     võttõks+N+Pl+Par: võttõkši
     võttõks+N+Pl+Dat: võttõkstõn
     võttõks+N+Pl+Ins: võttõkstõks
     võttõks+N+Pl+Ill: võttõkšiz
     võttõks+N+Pl+Ela: võttõkšist
